Maine, session 132, LD2155.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §1355-A, sub-§2-C is enacted to read:
2-C. Grandfathering of certain licenses issued prior to December 21, 2025. The
bureau may not suspend, revoke or refuse to renew a license issued under this section or
chapter 43 that was initially issued prior to December 21, 2025 solely on the basis that the
person or persons holding a majority ownership interest in the licensed manufacturing
facility were determined by the bureau after the license was initially issued to hold a
majority ownership interest in more than the allowable number of on-premises retail
licenses issued under chapter 43 if the on-premises retail licenses issued under chapter 43
were also initially issued prior to December 21, 2025.
A license grandfathered pursuant to this subsection may not be sold, transferred or
otherwise conveyed.
Page 1 - 132LR2942(08)